Wyoming, session 2026, HB0158.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 40-32-101 and 40-32-102 are created
to read:

CHAPTER 32
LABELING FOR DIRECT CURRENT FAST CHARGING STATIONS
HB0158

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0412

40-32-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter:

(i) "DC fast charging station" means a device
used to charge a motor vehicle that meets the definition of
"DC Level 1," "DC Level 2" or "DC Level 3" as defined in
Standard J1772 of the SAE International standards and any
future updates to those standards, or an equivalent power
output level;

(ii) "Energy resource category" means coal,
natural gas, wind, solar, hydroelectric, nuclear,
petroleum, biomass or biogas, geothermal or any other
energy resource;

(iii) "Public utility" means as defined by W.S.
37-1-101(a)(vi).

40-32-102. Labeling for direct current fast charging
stations; penalty.

HB0158

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0412
(a) Each operator of a DC fast charging station
operating within this state that receives electricity from
a public utility and not from any other source shall
display a clear and conspicuous label that is three (3)
inches wide and three (3) inches long on the DC fast
charging station identifying the single largest energy
resource category provided to the DC fast charging station
during the prior calendar year. The single largest energy
resource category under this subsection shall be calculated
by the public utility providing the electricity to the DC
fast charging station and shall be disclosed to the
operator of the DC fast charging station based on the
energy resource mix used by the public utility in the
certificated service territory where the DC fast charging
station is located.

(b) Each operator of a DC fast charging station
operating within this state that generates and uses on-site
electricity and that also receives electricity from a
public utility shall display a clear and conspicuous label
that is three (3) inches wide and three (3) inches long on
the DC fast charging station as follows:

HB0158

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0412
(i) If the electricity generated and used
on-site constitutes the single largest energy resource
category used to supply electricity to the DC fast charging
station during the prior calendar year, then the label
shall identify the on-site energy resource category;

(ii) If the electricity provided by the public
utility constitutes the single largest energy resource
category used to supply electricity to the DC fast charging
station during the prior calendar year, then the label
shall identify the single largest energy resource category
provided by the public utility. The single largest energy
resource category under this paragraph shall be calculated
by the public utility providing the electricity to the DC
fast charging station and shall be disclosed to the
operator of the DC fast charging station based on the
energy resource mix used by the public utility in the
certificated service territory where the DC fast charging
station is located.

(c) If the largest energy resource category under
subsection (a) or (b) of this section constitutes less than
fifty percent (50%) of the share of the electricity
HB0158

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0412
provided to the DC fast charging station during the prior
calendar year, then the label shall include the two (2)
largest energy resource categories.

(d) Upon request, a public utility shall provide to
the operator of a DC fast charging station the single
largest energy resource category or if applicable under
subsection (c) of this section, the two (2) largest energy
resource categories as calculated based on the energy
resource mix used by the public utility in the certificated
service territory where the DC fast charging station is
located. No public utility shall be required to provide the
operator with the largest energy resource categories for
each individual meter serving a DC fast charging station.

(e) Each operator of a DC fast charging station shall
update the label required under subsections (a) and (b) of
this section annually but not later than March 31 based on
the prior calendar year.

(f) Any operator of a DC fast charging station
violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor
HB0158

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0412
punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty
dollars ($750.00).

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0158